Utah statutes.
34A-7-203.   Requirements for operating an elevator or escalator -- Inspection -- Division duties.

(1)  An elevator or escalator may not operate in this state unless:

(a)  the owner or operator of the elevator or escalator obtains an inspection certificate under Subsection (3); and

(b)  the inspection certificate described in Subsection (1)(a) has not:

(i)  expired under Subsection (3); or

(ii)  been suspended under Section 34A-7-204.

(2)  An elevator or escalator used or proposed to be used in this state shall be inspected as to its safety to operate in accordance with the safety code:

(a)  every two years; or

(b)  more frequently than every two years if the division determines that more frequent inspections are necessary.

(3) (a)  If upon inspection an elevator or escalator is safe to operate in accordance with the safety code, the inspector shall issue to the owner or operator an inspection certificate.

(b)  An inspection certificate issued under Subsection (3)(a) shall expire two years from the date the inspection certificate is issued.

(4)  An inspector employed by the division under this part shall at all times meet nationally recognized standards of qualifications for inspectors of elevators and escalators, as defined by rule by the division.

(5)  The owner or operator of an elevator or escalator that is used in the state shall pay to the commission a fee in amounts set by the commission pursuant to Section 63J-1-504:

(a)  for inspection; and

(b)  for an inspection certificate.

(6)  The division:

(a)  shall provide for the inspection of elevators and escalators in accordance with this section;

(b)  shall adopt by rule one or more nationally recognized standards or other safety codes to be used in inspecting elevators or escalators; and

(c)  may adopt amendments to the safety code adopted under Subsection (6)(b).



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

